Montana, session 2025, SB229.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 41-3-433, MCA, is amended to read:
"41-3-433. Temporary investigative authority -- prohibition of removal under temporary
investigative authority. (1) The department may petition the court for authorization to conduct an investigation
into allegations of child abuse, neglect, or abandonment when necessary. An order for temporary investigative
authority may not be issued for a period longer than 90 days. The petition must be served as provided in 41-3-
422.
(2) If granted, the department's temporary investigative authority under subsection (1) may not
include the authority to remove a child. If the department seeks removal of a child outside of the immediate
removal provisions of 41-3-301 and in addition to its temporary investigative authority, the department shall
petition the court for immediate protection and emergency protective services as provided in 41-3-427."
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 229